West Virginia, session 2025, HB2044.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 16. West Virginia Public Employees Insurance Act §5-16-29. Limitation on PEIA participation. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, the director may not consider any employer eligible for participation in a plan except for the following:(1) All mandatory participants, including the State of West Virginia, its boards, agencies, commissions, departments, institutions, or spending units.(2) Any county board of education or public charter school established pursuant to §18- 5G-1 et seq. of this code, if the charter school includes in its charter contract entered into pursuant to §18-5G-7 of this code a determination to participate in the Public Employees Insurance program: Provided, That as it relates to eligible public charter schools, only employees directly employed by a charter school that is exempt from the payment of taxes under the United States Internal Revenue Code, Title 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), may participate in a plan.(3) Any employer participating in a plan as of the effective date of the enactment of this section in the regular session of the Legislature, 2021: Provided, That if an employer participating in a plan as of July 1, 2025, withdraws from the plan, said employer shall be eligible for participation in a plan within five (5) years from the date of withdrawal.